Utah statutes.
59-2-1309.   Publication of delinquency -- Seizure and sale -- Redemption -- Distribution of proceeds.

(1) (a)  On or before December 15 of each year, the commission shall publish a list of the delinquent rail car companies and state-assessed commercial vehicles:

(i)  in a newspaper having general circulation in the state; and

(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(b)  The list shall contain the names of the owners, when known, and a general description of the property assessed as to which the taxes are delinquent, and the amount of the delinquent taxes.

(c)  The commission shall publish with the list a notice that unless the delinquent taxes, together with the penalty, are paid before December 21, the property of the delinquent or so much of it as may be necessary to pay the amount of the taxes, penalty, and interest at the rate prescribed in Section 59-1-402 from December 31 to the date of sale, shall be seized and sold for taxes, interest, and costs, the sale to be made at any time and place at the discretion of the commission.

(d)  The provisions of law governing the seizure and sale by county treasurers of personal property for delinquent taxes shall apply to sales made by the commission under this section, except that notice of the time and place of the sale shall be given by publication:

(i)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the state; and

(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.

(2)  Property seized by the commission pursuant to this section may be redeemed, at any time prior to the sale, by payment of the full amount of taxes due from the delinquent together with all penalties, interest, and the costs then accrued.

(3)  All sums collected by the commission upon the sale or redemption of property pursuant to this section shall be immediately distributed as follows:

(a)  all interest, penalties, and costs to the appropriate county treasurer; and

(b)  any excess over the taxes, penalties, interest, and cost shall be deposited with the state treasurer subject to the order of the owner of the property sold, or the owner's heirs or assigns.

